src/main/resources/bg_BG.aff
SFX Y Y 200
SFX Y   аса       асат      .
SFX Y   аса       асе       .
SFX Y   аса       асейки    .
SFX Y   аса       асели     .
SFX Y   аса       аселите   .
SFX Y   аса       асем      .
SFX Y   аса       асен      .
SFX Y   аса       асена     .
SFX Y   аса       асената   .
SFX Y   аса       асени     .
SFX Y   аса       асените   .
SFX Y   аса       асения    .
SFX Y   аса       асеният   .
SFX Y   аса       асено     .
SFX Y   аса       асеното   .
SFX Y   аса       асете     .
SFX Y   аса       асеш      .
SFX Y   аса       асеше     .
SFX Y   аса       аси       .
SFX Y   аса       асла      .
SFX Y   аса       аслата    .
SFX Y   аса       асли      .
SFX Y   аса       аслите    .
SFX Y   аса       аслия     .
SFX Y   аса       аслият    .
SFX Y   аса       асло      .
SFX Y   аса       аслото    .
SFX Y   аса       асох      .
SFX Y   аса       асоха     .
SFX Y   аса       асохме    .
SFX Y   аса       асохте    .
SFX Y   аса       асъл      .
SFX Y   аса       асял      .
SFX Y   аса       асяла     .
SFX Y   аса       асялата   .
SFX Y   аса       асялия    .
SFX Y   аса       асялият   .
SFX Y   аса       асяло     .
SFX Y   аса       асялото   .
SFX Y   аса       асях      .
SFX Y   аса       асяха     .
SFX Y   аса       асяхме    .
SFX Y   аса       асяхте    .
SFX Y   аса       асящ      .
SFX Y   аса       асяща     .
SFX Y   аса       асящата   .
SFX Y   аса       асящи     .
SFX Y   аса       асящите   .
SFX Y   аса       асящия    .
SFX Y   аса       асящият   .
SFX Y   аса       асящо     .
SFX Y   аса       асящото   .
SFX Y   еса       есат      .
SFX Y   еса       есе       .
SFX Y   еса       есейки    .
SFX Y   еса       есели     .
SFX Y   еса       еселите   .
SFX Y   еса       есем      .
SFX Y   еса       есен      .
SFX Y   еса       есена     .
SFX Y   еса       есената   .
SFX Y   еса       есени     .
SFX Y   еса       есените   .
SFX Y   еса       есения    .
SFX Y   еса       есеният   .
SFX Y   еса       есено     .
SFX Y   еса       есеното   .
SFX Y   еса       есете     .
SFX Y   еса       есеш      .
SFX Y   еса       есеше     .
SFX Y   еса       еси       .
SFX Y   еса       есла      .
SFX Y   еса       еслата    .
SFX Y   еса       если      .
SFX Y   еса       еслите    .
SFX Y   еса       еслия     .
SFX Y   еса       еслият    .
SFX Y   еса       есло      .
SFX Y   еса       еслото    .
SFX Y   еса       есох      .
SFX Y   еса       есоха     .
SFX Y   еса       есохме    .
SFX Y   еса       есохте    .
SFX Y   еса       есъл      .
SFX Y   еса       есял      .
SFX Y   еса       есяла     .
SFX Y   еса       есялата   .
SFX Y   еса       есялия    .
SFX Y   еса       есялият   .
SFX Y   еса       есяло     .
SFX Y   еса       есялото   .
SFX Y   еса       есях      .
SFX Y   еса       есяха     .
SFX Y   еса       есяхме    .
SFX Y   еса       есяхте    .
SFX Y   еса       есящ      .
SFX Y   еса       есяща     .
SFX Y   еса       есящата   .
SFX Y   еса       есящи     .
SFX Y   еса       есящите   .
SFX Y   еса       есящия    .
SFX Y   еса       есящият   .
SFX Y   еса       есящо     .
SFX Y   еса       есящото   .
SFX Y   ка        кат       .
SFX Y   ка        кла       .
SFX Y   ка        клата     .
SFX Y   ка        кли       .
SFX Y   ка        клите     .
SFX Y   ка        клия      .
SFX Y   ка        клият     .
SFX Y   ка        кло       .
SFX Y   ка        клото     .
SFX Y   ка        кох       .
SFX Y   ка        коха      .
SFX Y   ка        кохме     .
SFX Y   ка        кохте     .
SFX Y   ка        къл       .
SFX Y   ка        чащ       .
SFX Y   ка        чаща      .
SFX Y   ка        чащата    .
SFX Y   ка        чащи      .
SFX Y   ка        чащите    .
SFX Y   ка        чащия     .
SFX Y   ка        чащият    .
SFX Y   ка        чащо      .
SFX Y   ка        чащото    .
SFX Y   ка        че        .
SFX Y   ка        чейки     .
SFX Y   ка        чел       .
SFX Y   ка        чела      .
SFX Y   ка        челата    .
SFX Y   ка        чели      .
SFX Y   ка        челите    .
SFX Y   ка        челия     .
SFX Y   ка        челият    .
SFX Y   ка        чело      .
SFX Y   ка        челото    .
SFX Y   ка        чем       .
SFX Y   ка        чен       .
SFX Y   ка        чена      .
SFX Y   ка        чената    .
SFX Y   ка        чени      .
SFX Y   ка        чените    .
SFX Y   ка        чения     .
SFX Y   ка        ченият    .
SFX Y   ка        чено      .
SFX Y   ка        ченото    .
SFX Y   ка        чете      .
SFX Y   ка        чех       .
SFX Y   ка        чеха      .
SFX Y   ка        чехме     .
SFX Y   ка        чехте     .
SFX Y   ка        чеш       .
SFX Y   ка        чеше      .
SFX Y   ка        чи        .
SFX Y   ча        ка        .
SFX Y   ча        кал       .
SFX Y   ча        кала      .
SFX Y   ча        калата    .
SFX Y   ча        кали      .
SFX Y   ча        калите    .
SFX Y   ча        калия     .
SFX Y   ча        калият    .
SFX Y   ча        кало      .
SFX Y   ча        калото    .
SFX Y   ча        ках       .
SFX Y   ча        каха      .
SFX Y   ча        кахме     .
SFX Y   ча        кахте     .
SFX Y   ча        чат       .
SFX Y   ча        че        .
SFX Y   ча        чейки     .
SFX Y   ча        чел       .
SFX Y   ча        чела      .
SFX Y   ча        челата    .
SFX Y   ча        чели      .
SFX Y   ча        челите    .
SFX Y   ча        челия     .
SFX Y   ча        челият    .
SFX Y   ча        чело      .
SFX Y   ча        челото    .
SFX Y   ча        чем       .
SFX Y   ча        чете      .
SFX Y   ча        чех       .
SFX Y   ча        чеха      .
SFX Y   ча        чехме     .
SFX Y   ча        чехте     .
SFX Y   ча        чеш       .
SFX Y   ча        чеше      .
SFX Y   ча        чещ       .
SFX Y   ча        чеща      .
SFX Y   ча        чещата    .
SFX Y   ча        чещи      .
SFX Y   ча        чещите    .
SFX Y   ча        чещия     .
SFX Y   ча        чещият    .
SFX Y   ча        чещо      .
SFX Y   ча        чещото    .
SFX Y   ча        чи        .
